California, session 20252026, SB699.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9025.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:9025.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a Member of the Legislature and an employee of the Legislature all Members and employees of the Legislature shall, within six months of the convening of a regular session of the Legislature, attend a course regarding the United States Constitution and the California Constitution.(b) (1) If a Member of the Legislature assumes their seat after a regular session is convened, the Member shall attend the course within six months of assuming their seat.(2) If an employee of the Legislature is hired after a regular session is convened, the employee shall attend the course within six months of their date of hire.(c) The Joint Rules Committee Legislative Counsel Bureau, in consultation with the Joint Rules Committee, shall develop and conduct the course described in subdivision (a). The course shall be at least two hours in length and address the principles of federalism, preemption, civil rights, and the separation of powers. at a minimum the following topics: federalism, preemption, separation of powers, civil rights, the Bill of Rights, state constitutional rights and freedoms, and the roles and responsibilities of the three branches of government at the state and federal levels.